Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1319
Claim; hearing; decision; payment.

(a) The State Treasurer shall consider any claim filed under sections 69-1301 to 69-1329 and may hold a hearing and receive evidence concerning it. If a hearing is held he shall prepare a finding and a decision in writing on each claim filed, stating the substance of any evidence heard by him and the reasons for his decision. The decision shall be a public record.

(b) If the claim is allowed, the State Treasurer shall make payment forthwith. The claim shall be paid without deduction for costs of notices or sale or for service charges.

Laws 1969, c. 611, § 19, p. 2489.